This glossary of economics is a list of definitions of terms and concepts used in economics, its sub-disciplines, and related fields.

0–9
401(a) Retirement Plan
A tax-deferred retirement savings plan defined by subsection 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. The 401(a) plan is established by an employer, and allows for contributions by the employer or both employer and employee. These plans are available to some employees of the government, educational institutions, and non-profits, and their funds can be rolled over to a different qualified retirement plan, such as a 401(k) or IRA, when changing jobs.

401(k) Retirement Plan
A type of retirement plan which is sponsored by an employer and in which the employer may match a portion of the employee's contributions. Most
contributions are tax-deferred until retirement withdraws occur.

403(b) Retirement Plan
Also called tax-sheltered annuity (TSA)
A U.S. tax-advantaged retirement savings plan available for public education organizations, some non-profit employers (only Internal Revenue Code 501(c)(3) organizations), cooperative hospital service organizations, and self-employed ministers in the United States. It has tax treatment similar to a 401(k) plan.

457 Retirement Plan
A type of nonqualified, tax advantaged deferred-compensation retirement plan that is available for governmental and certain nongovernmental employers in the United States. Unlike with a 401(k) plan, it has no 10% penalty for withdrawal before the age of 55 (59 years, 6 months for IRA accounts) (although the withdrawal is subject to ordinary income taxation). 457 plans can also allow independent contractors to participate in the plan, where 401(k) and 403(b) plans cannot.

A
absolute advantage
Also called resource cost advantage.
The ability of a party (whether an individual, firm, or country) to produce a greater quantity of a good, product, or service than competitors using the same amount of resources.

absorption
The total demand for all final marketed goods and services by all economic agents resident in an economy, regardless of the origin of the goods and services themselves

abandonment of the gold standard
The decision by a government to abandon a monetary system in which the standard economic unit of account is based on a fixed quantity of gold.

accelerator effect
A positive effect on private fixed investment because of the growth of the market economy. Rising GDP usually implies that profit expectations and business confidence rise, encouraging businesses to build more factories and other buildings and to install more machinery.

adaptive expectations
A hypothetical process by which people form expectations about what will happen in the future based on what has happened in the past.

AD–AS model
A macroeconomic model that explains price level and output through the relationship of downward-sloping aggregate demand (AD) and upward-sloping aggregate supply (AS).

AD–IA model
A macroeconomic model that explains inflation and output through the relationship of downward-sloping aggregate demand (AD) and  horizontal inflation adjustment (IA). The monetary policy rule (MPR) is assumed, which is that the central bank increases interest rates in response to increase in inflation and vice versa.

adverse selection
A market situation where buyers and sellers have different information, and participants with key information participate selectively in trades at the expense of other parties.

advertising elasticity of demand (AED)
Also called advertising elasticity.
Measures the sensitivity of a good's demand to a change in advertising.

agflation
Also called agrarian inflation.
An increase in the price of food and industrial agricultural crops when compared to the general rise in prices.

aggregate demand (AD)
Also called domestic final demand (DFD) or effective demand.
The total demand for goods and services in an economy. It specifies the amounts of goods and services that will be purchased at all possible price levels. Aggregate demand can also be interpreted as the demand for the gross domestic product of a country. It is often called effective demand, though this term also has a distinct meaning.

aggregate supply (AS)
Also called domestic final supply (DFS).
The total supply of goods and services in an economy.

aggregation problem
The difficult problem of finding a valid way to treat an empirical or theoretical aggregate as if it reacted like a less-aggregated measure, say, about behavior of an individual agent as described in general microeconomic theory.

agent
An actor or, more specifically, a decision maker in a model of some aspect of the economy.

agricultural economics
An applied field of economics concerned with the application of economic theory in optimizing the production and distribution of food.

AK model
A macroeconomic model that explains output through the relationship of total factor productivity and capital. It assumes that there is no diminishing return of capital.

Alchian–Allen effect
Also called the shipping the good apples out theorem, or the third law of demand.
When the prices of two substitute goods, such as high and low grades of the same product, are both increased by a fixed per-unit amount, consumption will shift toward the higher-grade product. This is because the added per-unit amount decreases the relative price of the higher-grade product.

Allais paradox
A choice problem showing an inconsistency of actual observed choices with the independence axiom of expected utility theory.

allocative efficiency
A state of the economy in which production represents consumer preferences; in particular, every good or service is produced up to the point where the last unit provides a marginal benefit to consumers equal to the marginal cost of producing. In the single-price model, at the point of allocative efficiency, price is equal to marginal cost.

alternative minimum tax (AMT)
A tax imposed by the U.S. federal government in addition to the regular income tax for certain individuals, estates, and trusts. High-income taxpayers must calculate and pay the greater of the AMT or regular tax.

ambiguity aversion
Also called uncertainty aversion.
Any preference for known risks over unknown risks.

American school
Also called the national system.
A school of thought based around industry protection, government investment in infrastructure, and a national bank.

Amoroso–Robinson relation
An equation that describes the relation between price, marginal revenue, and price elasticity of demand.

Anglo-Saxon model
A school of thought based around low levels of regulation and taxation, minimal public services, strong private property rights, contract enforcement, overall ease of doing business, and low barriers to free trade.

annual effective discount rate (AER)
The amount of interest paid or earned as a percentage of the balance at the end of the annual period.

anti-rival good
The opposite of a rival good. The more people share an anti-rival good, the more utility each person receives.

antitrust law
Also called a competition law or anti-monopoly law.
Any law that promotes or seeks to maintain market competition by regulating anti-competitive conduct by companies. Competition law is implemented through public and private enforcement. It is also known as "antitrust law" in the United States for historical reasons and as "anti-monopoly law" in China and Russia.

applied economics
The application of economic theory and econometrics in specific settings. As one of the two sets of fields of economics (the other being the core), it is typically characterized by the application of the core, i.e. economic theory and econometrics, to address practical issues in a range of fields.

appropriate technology
A movement (and its manifestations) encompassing technological choice and application that is small-scale, decentralized, labor-intensive, energy-efficient, environmentally sound, and locally autonomous.

arbitrage
The practice of taking advantage of a price difference between two or more markets by striking a combination of matching deals that capitalize upon the imbalance, with the profit being the difference between the market prices.

Arrow–Debreu model
Also called the Arrow–Debreu–McKenzie model or ADM model.
A model that suggests there must be a set of prices such that aggregate supplies will equal aggregate demands for every commodity in the economy, given certain assumptions. It can be used to prove the existence of general equilibrium (or Walrasian equilibrium) of an economy.

Arrow-Debreu security
Also called a state-price security, pure security, or primitive security.
A contract that agrees to pay one unit of a numeraire (a currency or a commodity) if a particular state occurs at a particular time in the future and pays zero numeraire in all the other states.

Arrow information paradox (AIP)
Also called Arrow's disclosure paradox.
A problem faced by companies when considering the transfer of intellectual property. A company may wish to sell some information, but it cannot fully describe the capabilities of the information without effectively transferring the information for free.

Arrow's impossibility theorem
Also called the general possibility theorem or Arrow's paradox.
When voters have three or more distinct options, no ranked voting electoral system can convert the ranked preferences of individuals into a community-wide (complete and transitive) ranking while also meeting the specified set of criteria: unrestricted domain, non-dictatorship, Pareto efficiency, and independence of irrelevant alternatives.

Atkinson–Stiglitz theorem
Where the utility function is separable between labor and all commodities, no indirect taxes need be employed.

Aumann's agreement theorem
If the probabilistic beliefs of agents who share a common prior and update their probabilistic beliefs by Bayes' rule, regarding a fixed event, are common knowledge then these probabilities must coincide. Thus, agents cannot have common knowledge of a disagreement over the posterior probability of a given event.

austerity
A set of political-economic policies that aim to reduce government budget deficits through spending cuts, tax increases, or a combination of both.

Austrian School
A heterodox school of economic thought that is based on methodological individualism—the concept that social phenomena result from the motivations and actions of individuals.

autarky
The characteristic of being self-sufficient; the term is usually applied to political states or their economic systems. Autarky is possible when an entity can survive or continue its activities without external assistance or international trade. If a self-sufficient economy also deliberately refuses all trade with the outside world, then it is called a closed economy.

automatic stabilizer
A feature of the structure of modern government budgets, particularly income taxes and welfare spending, that acts to damp out fluctuations in real GDP.

autonomous consumption
Also called exogenous consumption. 
The consumption expenditure that occurs when income levels are zero. Such consumption is considered autonomous of income only when expenditure on these consumables does not vary with changes in income; generally, it may be required to fund necessities and debt obligations. If income levels are actually zero, this consumption counts as dissaving, because it is financed by borrowing or using up savings.

average cost
Also called unit cost.
A quantity equal to the total cost divided by the number of goods produced (the output quantity, Q). It is also equal to the sum of variable costs (total variable costs divided by Q) plus average fixed costs (total fixed costs divided by Q).

average fixed cost
The fixed costs (FC) of production divided by the quantity (Q) of output produced. Fixed costs are those costs that must be incurred in fixed quantity regardless of the level of output produced.

average variable cost
A firm's variable costs (labour, electricity, etc.) divided by the quantity of output produced. Variable costs are those costs which vary with the output.

average tax rate
The ratio of the total amount of taxes paid to the total tax base (taxable income or spending), expressed as a percentage.

B
Backus–Kehoe–Kydland puzzle
Also called the Backus–Kehoe–Kydland consumption correlation puzzle or BKK puzzle.
The observation that consumption is much less correlated across countries than output. According to theory we should observe that consumption is much more correlated across countries than output in an Arrow–Debreu economy.

Backus–Smith puzzle
Also called the Backus-Smith consumption-real exchange rate puzzle or consumption – real-exchange-rate anomaly.
The observation that the correlations between consumption and real exchange rates are zero or negative. This is contrary to economic theory which predicts that with full risk sharing, relative consumption should be perfectly correlated with the real exchange rate.

backward advantage
Also called the advantage of backwardness or the latecomer's advantage.
The advantage that a still-developing country has because it can take advantage of the technology/industry gap with a developed country by implementing a new technology or venturing into an industry that is new to its economy but mature in the developed country.

backward disadvantage
Also called the latecomer's disadvantage.
The fact that it is easier for late-development countries to imitate technologies, but more difficult to imitate the system, because the reform will offend vested interests.

backward induction
The process of reasoning backwards in time, from the end of a problem or situation, to determine a sequence of optimal actions. It proceeds by first considering the last time a decision might be made and choosing what to do in any situation at that time. Using this information, one can then determine what to do at the second-to-last time of decision. This process continues backwards until one has determined the best action for every possible situation (i.e. for every possible information set) at every point in time.

backwardness
A lack of progress by a person or group to some perceived cultural norm of advancement.

balance of payments
Also called balance of international payments and abbreviated B.O.P. or BoP.
A record or summary of all economic transactions between the residents of a country and the rest of the world in a particular period of time (e.g. over a quarter of a year or, more commonly, over a year). These transactions are made by individuals, firms and government bodies. Thus the balance of payments includes all external visible and non-visible transactions of a country.

balance of trade
Also called commercial balance or net exports (NX).
The difference between the monetary value of a nation's exports and imports over a certain period. Sometimes a distinction is made between a balance of trade for goods versus one for services. "Balance of trade" can be a misleading term because trade measures a flow of exports and imports over a given period of time, rather than a balance of exports and imports at a given point in time. Also, balance of trade does not necessarily imply that exports and imports are "in balance" with each other or anything else.

balanced budget
A budget, particularly that of a government, in which revenues are equal to expenditures. Thus, neither a budget deficit nor a budget surplus exists (the accounts "balance"). The term may also refer more generally to a budget that has no budget deficit but could possibly have a budget surplus. A cyclically balanced budget is a budget that is not necessarily balanced year-to-year, but is balanced over the economic cycle, running a surplus in boom years and running a deficit in lean years, with these offsetting over time.

bank
A financial institution that accepts deposits from the public and creates credit. Lending activities can be performed either directly or indirectly through capital markets. Due to their importance in the financial stability of a country, banks are highly regulated in most countries. Most nations have institutionalized a system known as fractional reserve banking, under which banks hold liquid assets equal to only a portion of their current liabilities. In addition to other regulations intended to ensure liquidity, banks are generally subject to minimum capital requirements based on an international set of capital standards, known as the Basel Accords.

bank rate
Also called the discount rate in American English.
The rate of interest which a central bank charges on its loans and advances to a commercial bank.

bankruptcy
The inability to pay debt due to loss of income, increased spending, or an unforeseen financial crisis.

bargaining model of war
A method of representing the potential gains and losses and ultimate outcome of war between two actors as a bargaining interaction.

barriers to entry
In theories of competition in economics, a cost that must be incurred by a new entrant into a market that incumbents do not have or have not had to incur. Because barriers to entry protect incumbent firms and restrict competition in a market, they can contribute to distortionary prices and are therefore most important when discussing antitrust policy. Barriers to entry often cause or aid the existence of monopolies or give companies market power.

barter
In trade, a system of exchange in which participants in a transaction directly exchange goods or services for other goods or services without using a medium of exchange, such as money. Economists distinguish barter from gift economies in many ways; barter, for example, features immediate reciprocal exchange that is not delayed in time. Barter usually takes place on a bilateral basis, but may be multilateral (i.e. mediated through a trade exchange). In most developed countries, barter usually only exists parallel to monetary systems to a very limited extent. Market actors use barter as a replacement for money as the method of exchange in times of monetary crisis, such as when currency becomes unstable (e.g. by hyperinflation or a deflationary spiral) or simply unavailable for conducting commerce.

base erosion and profit shifting (BEPS)
Corporate tax planning strategies used by multinationals to "shift" profits from higher-tax jurisdictions to lower-tax jurisdictions or no-tax locations.

Baxter-Stockman neutrality of exchange rate regime puzzle
Also called the exchange rate disconnect puzzle.
The unexpectedly weak relationship between the exchange rate and any other macroeconomic variable.

Beckstrom's law
"The value of a network equals the net value added to each user’s transactions conducted through that network, summed over all users."

behavioral economics
The branch of economics that studies the effects of psychological, cognitive, emotional, cultural and social factors on the economic decisions of individuals and institutions and how those decisions vary from those implied by classical theory.

Bellman equation
The dynamic programming equation associated with discrete-time optimization problems. It writes the "value" of a decision problem at a certain point in time in terms of the payoff from some initial choices and the "value" of the remaining decision problem that results from those initial choices.

bequest motive
Seeks to provide an economic justification for the phenomenon of intergenerational transfers of wealth; in other words, to explain why people leave money behind when they die.

Bertrand competition
A model of competition that describes interactions among producers that set prices and their consumers that choose quantities at the prices set.

Bertrand–Edgeworth model
A microeconomic model of price-setting oligopoly which studies what happens when there is a homogeneous product (i.e. consumers want to buy from the cheapest seller) where there is a limit to the output of firms which they are willing and able to sell at a particular price. This differs from the Bertrand competition model where it is assumed that firms are willing and able to meet all demand. The limit to output can be considered a physical capacity constraint which is the same at all prices (as in Edgeworth’s work) or to vary with price under other assumptions.

Bertrand paradox
A situation in which two players (firms) reach a state of Nash equilibrium where both firms charge a price equal to marginal cost.

biflation
Also called mixflation.
A state of the economy in which the processes of inflation and deflation occur simultaneously in different parts of the economy. 

big push model
A concept in development economics or welfare economics that emphasizes that a firm's decision whether to industrialize or not depends on its expectation of what other firms will do. It assumes economies of scale and oligopolistic market structure and explains when industrialization would happen.

Birmingham school
A school of thought based around opposing the gold standard, advocating for expansionary monetary policy, and belief in underconsumption.

Bishop–Cannings theorem
A theorem in evolutionary game theory that states that (i) all members of a mixed evolutionarily stable strategy  have the same payoff, and (ii) that none of these can also be a pure ESS.

Black–Scholes model
Also called the Black–Scholes–Merton model. 
A mathematical model for the dynamics of a financial market containing derivative investment instruments. From the partial differential equation in the model, known as the Black–Scholes equation, one can deduce the Black–Scholes formula, which gives a theoretical estimate of the price of European-style options and shows that the option has a unique price regardless of the risk of the security and its expected return (instead replacing the security's expected return with the risk-neutral rate). The formula led to a boom in options trading and provided mathematical legitimacy to the activities of the Chicago Board Options Exchange and other options markets around the world. It is widely used, although often with adjustments and corrections, by options market participants.: 751 

board of governors
The main governing body that directs the operations of the United States Federal Reserve System. Its seven members supervise the 12 Federal Reserve Districts.

bond
In finance, an instrument of indebtedness of the bond issuer to the holders. The most common types of bonds include municipal bonds and corporate bonds. The bond is a debt security, under which the issuer owes the holders a debt and (depending on the terms of the bond) is obliged to pay them interest (the coupon) or to repay the principal at a later date, termed the maturity date. Interest is usually payable at fixed intervals (semiannual, annual, or sometimes monthly). Very often the bond is negotiable, that is, the ownership of the instrument can be transferred in the secondary market. This means that once the transfer agents at the bank medallion stamp the bond, it is highly liquid on the secondary market.

Bondareva–Shapley theorem
Describes a necessary and sufficient condition for the non-emptiness of the core of a cooperative game in characteristic function form.

boots theory
Also called the Sam Vimes theory of socioeconomic unfairness. 
Purchasing cheap, low-quality goods may become more expensive in the long run because they must be replaced more frequently. For example, purchasing expensive, high-quality boots may be cheaper over a long time because cheaper boots would quickly wear out and require replacement.

borrower
See debtor.

bounded rationality
The idea that rationality is limited when individuals make decisions, and under these limitations, rational individuals will select a decision that is satisfactory rather than optimal.

Braess's paradox
The observation that adding one or more roads to a road network can slow down overall traffic flow through it.

Brander–Spencer model
An economic model in international trade that illustrates a situation where a government can subsidize domestic firms to help them in their competition against foreign producers and in doing so enhances national welfare.

break-even
Also called the break-even point (BEP).
The point at which total cost and total revenue are equal, i.e. "even". There is no net loss or gain, and one has "broken even", though opportunity costs have been paid and capital has received the risk-adjusted, expected return. In short, all costs that must be paid are paid, and there is neither profit nor loss.

Bretton Woods system
A monetary system which established the rules for commercial and financial relations among the United States, Canada, Western Europe, Australia, and Japan after the 1944 Bretton Woods Agreement. The Bretton Woods system was the first example of a fully negotiated monetary order intended to govern monetary relations among independent states. The chief features were an obligation for each country to adopt a monetary policy that maintained its external exchange rates within 1 percent by tying its currency to gold and the ability of the IMF to bridge temporary imbalances of payments; there was also a need to address the lack of cooperation among other countries and to prevent competitive devaluation of the currencies.

budget deficit
Also simply called spending.
The amount by which spending exceeds revenue over a particular period of time; it is the opposite of budget surplus. The term may be applied to the budget of a government, private company, or individual.

budget set
Also called an opportunity set.
The set of all possible consumption bundles that an individual can afford, given the prices of goods and the individual's income level. The budget set is bounded above by the budget line. Graphically speaking, all the consumption bundles that lie inside and on the budget constraint form the budget set. By most definitions, budget sets must be compact and convex.

budget surplus
A budget's revenues in excess of its expenditures.

buffer stock scheme
Also called intervention storage or the ever-normal granary.
An attempt to use commodity storage for the purposes of stabilising prices in an entire economy or an individual (commodity) market. Specifically, commodities are bought when a surplus exists in the economy, stored, and are then sold from these stores when economic shortages in the economy occur.

bullionism
An economic theory that defines wealth by the amount of precious metals owned.

business cycle
Also called the economic cycle or trade cycle.
The downward and upward movement of gross domestic product (GDP) around its long-term growth trend. The length of a business cycle is the period of time containing a single boom and contraction in sequence. These fluctuations typically involve shifts over time between periods of relatively rapid economic growth (expansions or booms) and periods of relative stagnation or decline (contractions or recessions).

business economics
A branch of applied economics which uses economic theory and quantitative methods to analyze business enterprises and the factors contributing to the diversity of organizational structures and the relationships of firms with labour, capital and product markets.

business sector
Also called the corporate sector or sometimes simply business.
The part of the economy made up by companies. It is generally considered a subset of the domestic economy, excluding the economic activities of general government, of private households, and of non-profit organizations serving individuals.

C
Cambridge capital controversy
Also called the capital controversy or the two Cambridges debate
A dispute between proponents of two differing theoretical and mathematical positions in economics concerning the nature and role of capital goods and a critique of the neoclassical vision of aggregate production and distribution.

Cambridge equation
Relates money demand, price level, and real national income in the Cambridge quantity theory of money.

cameralism
A German science of public administration in the 18th and early 19th centuries that aimed at strong management of a centralized economy for the benefit mainly of the state. 

cap and trade (CAT)
A market-based approach to limiting negative externalities (for example, pollution) by providing economic incentives for reducing the production of said negative externalities. A central authority or governmental body allocates or sells a limited number (a "cap") of permits that allow the creation of a specific negative externality over a set time period. Permit owners are then allowed to sell these permits to others.

capacity utilization
The extent to which an enterprise or a nation uses its installed productive capacity. It is the relationship between output that is produced with the installed equipment and the potential output which could be produced with it if capacity was fully used.

capital
Any asset that can enhance one's power to perform economically useful work. Capital goods, real capital, or capital assets are already-produced, durable goods or any non-financial asset that is used in production of goods or services. Capital is distinct from land (or non-renewable resources) in that capital can be increased by human labor. At any given moment in time, total physical capital may be referred to as the capital stock (which is not to be confused with the capital stock of a business entity).

capital account
Also called the capital and financial account
Reflects net change in ownership of national assets. A surplus in the capital account means money is flowing into the country, and the inbound flows effectively represent borrowings or sales of assets. A deficit in the capital account means money is flowing out of the country, and it suggests the nation is increasing its ownership of foreign assets.

capital accumulation
Any net addition to existing wealth and/or a redistribution of wealth. Capital accumulation is the dynamic that motivates the pursuit of profit, involving the investment of money or any financial asset with the goal of increasing the initial monetary value of said asset as a financial return.

capital cost
A fixed, one-time expense incurred on the purchase of land, buildings, construction, and equipment used in the production of goods or in the rendering of services. In other words, it is the total cost needed to bring a project to a commercially operable status. Whether a particular cost is capital or not depends on many factors, such as accounting, tax laws, and materiality.

capital flight
Occurs when money or assets rapidly flow out of a country due to an event of economic consequence. Such events may include an increase in taxes on capital or capital holders or the government of the country defaulting on its debt that disturbs investors and causes them to lower their valuation of the assets in that country or otherwise to lose confidence in its economic strength.

capital formation
Any method for increasing the amount of capital owned or under one's control, or any method in utilizing or mobilizing capital resources for investment purposes. Capital formation also sometimes refers to a specific statistical concept, also known as net investment, which measures the net additions to the (physical) capital stock of a country (or an economic sector) in an accounting interval. Capital formation is also sometimes a modern general term for capital accumulation, referring to the total "stock of capital" that has been formed, or to the growth of this total capital stock.

capital gain
The profit earned on the sale of an asset which has increased in value over the holding period. An asset may include tangible property, a car, a business, or intangible property such as shares.

capital good
A durable good that is used in the production of goods or services. Capital goods are one of the three types of producer goods, the other two being land and labour, which are also known collectively as primary factors of production. This classification originated with classical economics and has remained the dominant method for classification.

capital intensity
The amount of fixed or real capital present in relation to other factors of production, especially labor. At the level of either a production process or the aggregate economy, it may be estimated by the capital to labor ratio, such as from the points along a capital/labor isoquant.

capitalism
An economic system based on the private ownership of the means of production and their operation for profit. Central characteristics of capitalism include capital accumulation, competitive markets, price systems, private property, property rights recognition, voluntary exchange, and wage labor..

cartel
Any group of firms that colludes and acts as a single coordinated whole to restrict output and drive up prices.

cash
Money in the physical form of currency, such as banknotes and coins.

central bank
Also called a reserve bank or monetary authority. 
An institution that manages the currency, money supply, and interest rates of an entire state or nation. Central banks also usually oversee the commercial banking system of their respective countries. In contrast to a commercial bank, a central bank possesses a monopoly on increasing the monetary base in the state, and usually also prints the national currency, which usually serves as the state's legal tender. Central banks also act as a "lender of last resort" to the banking sector during times of financial crisis. Most central banks usually also have supervisory and regulatory powers to ensure the solvency of member institutions, prevent bank runs, and prevent reckless or fraudulent behavior by member banks.

Certificate of Deposit (CD or COD)
A savings instrument that usually earns more interest than a savings account but is bound by limits set within a contract.

ceteris paribus
A phrase or clause often loosely translated as "holding all else constant." It does not imply that no other things will in fact change; rather, it isolates the effect of one particular change.

chartalism
A heterodox theory of money that argues that money originated historically with states' attempts to direct economic activity rather than as a spontaneous solution to the problems with barter or as a means with which to tokenize debt, and that fiat currency has value in exchange because of sovereign power to levy taxes on economic activity payable in the currency they issue.

Chicago school

Choice (CD or COD)
Making a decision when facing multiple possible options.

choice modelling

circular flow of income
Also simply called circular flow.
A model of the economy in which the major exchanges are represented as flows of money, goods and services, etc. between economic agents. The flows of money and goods exchanged in a closed circuit correspond in value, but run in the opposite direction. The circular flow analysis is the basis of national accounts and hence of macroeconomics.

circulation

citizen's dividend

classical economics
Or classical political economy, is a school of thought in economics that flourished, primarily in Britain, in the late 18th and early-to-mid 19th century. Its main thinkers are held to be Adam Smith, Jean-Baptiste Say, David Ricardo, Thomas Robert Malthus, and John Stuart Mill. These economists produced a theory of market economies as largely self-regulating systems, governed by natural laws of production and exchange (famously captured by Adam Smith's metaphor of the invisible hand).

classical general equilibrium model

club good

Coase conjecture

Coase theorem

cobweb model

collective action

collective action problem

collusion

command economy
An economy in which the government directs all economic activity.

commerce
Relates to "the exchange of goods and services, especially on a large scale". It includes legal, economic, political, social, cultural and technological systems that operate in a country or in international trade.

commodity
An economic good or service that has full or substantial fungibility: that is, the market treats instances of the good as equivalent or nearly so with no regard to who produced them.

communism

comparative advantage
Also called opportunity cost advantage.
The ability to produce most efficiently given all of the other products that could be produced.

compensating differential

Competition (CD or COD)
The presence in a market of independent buyers and sellers competing with one another and the freedom of buyers and sellers to enter and leave the market.

competition law
Also called an antitrust law or anti-monopoly law.
Any law that promotes or seeks to maintain market competition by regulating anti-competitive conduct by companies.

competitive market
A market in which many sellers compete against each
other to attract customers. Each seller has an incentive to sell at the lowest
price possible to attract customers, so prices tend to be driven so low that
the sellers can just barely make a profit.

complementary goods
Goods that are bought and used together.

complex multiplier
The multiplier by which a change in autonomous expenditure changes the equilibrium income in an economy.

compound interest
The addition of interest to the principal sum of a loan or deposit; it is often interpreted as "interest on interest". Compound interest is the result of reinvesting interest, rather than paying it out, so that interest in the next period is then earned on the principal sum plus any previously accumulated interest. Contrast simple interest.

computable general equilibrium (CGE)
Also called applied general equilibrium (AGE).
A class of economic models that use actual economic data to estimate how an economy might react to changes in policy, technology, or other external factors.
 
computational economics
A research discipline at the interface of economics, computer science, and management science which encompasses computational modeling of economic systems, whether agent-based, general-equilibrium, macroeconomic, or rational-expectations, computational econometrics and statistics, computational finance, computational tools for the design of automated internet markets, programming tools specifically designed for computational economics, and pedagogical tools for the teaching of computational economics.

concentration ratio

conspicuous consumption
The consumer practice of buying and using goods of a higher quality, price, or in greater quantity than practical.

conspicuous compassion
The ostentatious use of charity meant to enhance the reputation and social prestige of the donor.

consumer
A member of a household that spends on goods and services.

consumer choice
A theory of microeconomics that relates preferences to consumption expenditures and to consumer demand curves. It analyzes how consumers maximize the desirability of their consumption as measured by their preferences subject to limitations on their expenditures, by maximizing utility subject to a consumer budget constraint.

consumer confidence
An economic indicator that measures the degree of optimism that consumers feel about the overall state of the economy and their personal financial situation.

consumer price index (CPI)
Measures changes in the price level of market basket of consumer goods and services purchased by households.
The CPI is a statistical estimate constructed using the prices of a sample of representative items whose prices are collected periodically. Sub-indices and sub-sub-indices are computed for different categories and sub-categories of goods and services, being combined to produce the overall index with weights reflecting their shares in the total of the consumer expenditures covered by the index. It is one of several price indices calculated by most national statistical agencies. The annual percentage change in a CPI is used as a measure of inflation. A CPI can be used to index (i.e. adjust for the effect of inflation) the real value of wages, salaries, and pensions; to regulate prices; and to deflate monetary magnitudes to show changes in real values. In most countries, the CPI, along with the population census, is one of the most closely watched national economic statistics.

consumer surplus
the difference between the maximum price a consumer is willing to pay and the actual price they do pay. If a consumer is willing to pay more for a unit of a good than the current asking price, they are getting more benefit from the purchased product than they would if the price was their maximum willingness to pay. They are receiving the same benefit, the obtainment of the good, with a smaller cost as they are spending less than they would if they were charged their maximum willingness to pay. 

consumerism
Economic policies which emphasize consumption.
  
consumption
According to mainstream economists, only the final purchase of goods and services by individuals constitutes consumption, while other types of expenditure—in particular, fixed investment, intermediate consumption, and government spending—are placed in separate categories (see consumer choice). Other economists define consumption much more broadly, as the aggregate of all economic activity that does not entail the design, production and marketing of goods and services (e.g. the selection, adoption, use, disposal and recycling of goods and services).

consumption function
A mathematical function which describes a relationship between consumption and disposable income. The concept is believed to have been introduced into macroeconomics by John Maynard Keynes in 1936, who used it to develop the notion of a government spending multiplier.

contract curve
In microeconomics, the contract curve is the set of points representing final allocations of two goods between two people that could occur as a result of mutually beneficial trading between those people given their initial allocations of the goods. All the points on this locus are Pareto efficient allocations, meaning that from any one of these points there is no reallocation that could make one of the people more satisfied with his or her allocation without making the other person less satisfied. The contract curve is the subset of the Pareto efficient points that could be reached by trading from the people's initial holdings of the two goods.

contract theory
The study of how economic actors can and do construct contractual arrangements, generally in the presence of asymmetric information. Because of its connections with both agency and incentives, contract theory is often categorized within a field known as law and economics.

convergence

convexity
In the Arrow–Debreu model of general economic equilibrium, agents have convex budget sets and convex preferences: at equilibrium prices, the budget hyperplane supports the best attainable indifference curve. The profit function is the convex conjugate of the cost function. Convex analysis is the standard tool for analyzing textbook economics. Non‑convex phenomena in economics have been studied with nonsmooth analysis, which generalizes convex analysis.

coordination good

corporate tax

corporation
A type of business organization owned by many people but treated by law as though it were an individual person; it can own property, pay taxes, make contracts, and contribute to political causes.

cost
1.  The value of money that is used up to produce a good or deliver a service, and hence is no longer available for further use. In business, the cost may be one of acquisition, in which case the amount of money expended to acquire a good or service is counted as the cost; in this case, money is the input that is gone in order to acquire the thing. This acquisition cost may be the sum of the cost of production as incurred by the original producer and of further costs of transaction as incurred by the acquirer over and above the price paid to the producer. Usually, the price designated by the producer also includes a mark-up for profit over the cost of production.
2.  More generally, a performance metric that is totaling up as a result of a process or as a differential for the result of a decision. Hence cost is the metric used in the standard modeling paradigm applied to economic processes. Costs (pl.) are often further described based on their timing or their applicability.

cost curve
A graph of the costs of production as a function of total quantity produced. In a free market economy, productively efficient firms optimize their production process by minimizing cost consistent with each possible level of production, and the result is a cost curve; and profit maximizing firms use cost curves to decide output quantities. There are various types of cost curves, all related to each other, including total and average cost curves; marginal ("for each additional unit") cost curves, which are equal to the differential of the total cost curves; and variable cost curves. Some are applicable to the short run, others to the long run.

cost of living
The cost of maintaining a certain standard of living. Changes in the cost of living over time are often operationalized in a cost-of-living index. Cost of living calculations are also used to compare the cost of maintaining a certain standard of living in different geographic areas. Differences in cost of living between locations can also be measured in terms of purchasing power parity rates.

cost overrun
Also called cost increase or budget overrun.
A situation involving unexpected incurred costs. A cost overrun occurs when an underestimation of the actual cost during budgeting results in costs that are in excess of budgeted amounts.

cost the limit of price

Cournot competition

cost-benefit analysis (CBA)
Sometimes called benefit costs analysis (BCA).
A systematic approach to estimating the strengths and weaknesses of alternative options (for example in transactions, activities, or functional business requirements). It is often used to determine the option or options that provide the best approach to achieve benefits while preserving savings. Cost-benefit analysis may be used to compare potential (or completed) courses of actions, or estimate (or evaluate) the value against costs of a single decision, project, or policy. Common areas of application include commercial transactions, functional business decisions, policy decisions (especially government policy), and project investments.

cost-of-production theory of value
The theory that the price of an object or condition is determined by the sum of the cost of the resources that went into producing it. The cost can comprise any of the factors of production (including labor, capital, or land) as well as taxation.

cost-push inflation

credit bureau
An agency that tracks the credit, employment, and housing history of consumers and assigns them a credit score.

credit card
A payment card issued to users (cardholders) to enable the cardholder to pay a merchant for goods and services based on the cardholder's promise to the card issuer to pay them at a later time for the cost of the good or service plus other agreed-upon fees and charges. The card issuer (usually a bank) creates a revolving account and grants a line of credit to the cardholder, from which the cardholder can borrow money for payment to a merchant or as a cash advance.

credit score
A numerical value assigned to a person's potential ability to repay debt. A good credit score in the United States is approximately 700.

credit rating
An evaluation of the credit risk of a prospective debtor (an individual, business, company, or government), predicting their ability to pay back the debt, and an implicit forecast of the likelihood of the debtor defaulting on the debt. Credit rating represents an evaluation of a credit rating agency of the qualitative and quantitative information for the prospective debtor, including information provided by the prospective debtor and other non-public information obtained by the credit rating agency's analysts. A subset of credit rating called credit reporting or credit score is a numeric evaluation of an individual's credit worthiness, which is conducted by a credit bureau or consumer credit reporting agency.

credit union
A financial institution that is usually local and owned by its members.

creditor
A person or a firm that lends money to a borrower.

criticism of capitalism

crisis theory

critique of work

cross elasticity of demand (XED)
Measures the sensitivity of a good's demand to the price of a different good.

crowding out
A phenomenon that occurs when increased government involvement in a sector of a market economy substantially affects the remainder of the market, either on the supply or demand side of the market.

crowding-in effect

cultural economics
The branch of economics that studies the relationship between culture and economic outcomes. Here, "culture" is defined by shared beliefs and preferences of respective groups. Programmatic issues include whether and how much culture matters to economic outcomes and what its relation is to institutions. As a growing field in behavioral economics, the role of culture in economic behavior is increasingly being demonstrated to cause significant differentials in decision-making and the management and valuation of assets.

currency
Money in any form when in actual use or circulation as a medium of exchange, especially circulating banknotes and coins. A more general definition is that a currency is a "system" of money (monetary units) in common use, especially within a particular nation.

current account
A country's current account is one of the two components of its balance of payments, the other being the capital account (also known as the financial account). The current account consists of the balance of trade, net primary income or factor income (earnings on foreign investments minus payments made to foreign investors) and net cash transfers, that have taken place over a given period of time. The current account balance is one of two major measures of a country's foreign trade (the other being the net capital outflow). A current account surplus indicates that the value of a country's net foreign assets (i.e. assets less liabilities) grew over the period in question, and a current account deficit indicates that it shrank. Both government and private payments are included in the calculation. It is called the current account because goods and services are generally consumed in the current period.

cyclical unemployment
Unemployment resulting from the business cycle. It is unpredictable.

D
DAD–SAS model

dead cat bounce

deadweight loss
Also called excess burden or allocative inefficiency. 
A loss of economic efficiency that occurs when the free-market equilibrium for a good or service is not achieved. Deadweight loss can be caused by monopoly pricing in the case of artificial scarcity, an externality, a tax or subsidy, or a compulsory price ceiling or price floor such as a minimum wage.

Debreu's representation theorems

debt
Total money owed.

debtor
An entity that owes a debt to another entity. The entity may be an individual, a firm, a government, a company, or another legal person. The counterparty to which the debt is owed is called a creditor. When the counterparty of the arrangement is a bank, the debtor is more often referred to as a borrower.

deficit spending
Also called budget deficit or simply deficit.
The amount by which spending exceeds revenue over a particular period of time; it is the opposite of budget surplus. The term may be applied to the budget of a government, private company, or individual.

deflation
A decrease in the general price level of goods and services. Deflation occurs when the inflation rate falls below 0% (a negative inflation rate); though inflation reduces the value of currency over time, deflation increases it. This allows more goods and services to be bought than before with the same amount of currency. Deflation is distinct from disinflation, which occurs when the inflation rate decreases but is still positive.

deflator
A value that allows data to be measured over time in terms of some base period, usually through a price index, in order to distinguish between changes in the money value of a gross national product (GNP) that come from a change in prices, and changes from a change in physical output. It is the measure of the price level for some quantity. A deflator serves as a price index in which the effects of inflation are nulled. It is the difference between real and nominal GDP.

deleveraging

demand
The whole range of quantities that a person or group with a given income and preferences demands at various prices.

demand curve
A line on a graph that represents how much of a good or service buyers are going to consume at various prices.

demand deposit
Demand deposits, bank money or scriptural money are funds held in demand deposit accounts in commercial banks. These account balances are usually considered money and form the greater part of the narrowly defined money supply of a country.

demand shock
A sudden event that increases or decreases demand for goods or services temporarily.

demand-pull inflation

demographic economics
Also called population economics.
The application of economic analysis to demography, the study of human populations, including size, growth, density, distribution, and vital statistics.

depreciation
The gradual decrease in the economic value of the capital stock of a firm, nation, or other entity, either through physical depreciation, obsolescence, or changes in the demand for the services of the capital in question. If the capital stock is 
  
    
      
        
          K
          
            t
          
        
      
    
    {\displaystyle K_{t}}
   in one period 
  
    
      
        t
      
    
    {\displaystyle t}
  , gross (total) investment spending on newly produced capital is 
  
    
      
        
          I
          
            t
          
        
      
    
    {\displaystyle I_{t}}
   and depreciation is 
  
    
      
        
          D
          
            t
          
        
      
    
    {\displaystyle D_{t}}
  , the capital stock in the next period, 
  
    
      
        
          K
          
            t
            +
            1
          
        
      
    
    {\displaystyle K_{t+1}}
  , is 
  
    
      
        
          K
          
            t
          
        
        +
        
          I
          
            t
          
        
        −
        
          D
          
            t
          
        
      
    
    {\displaystyle K_{t}+I_{t}-D_{t}}
  . The net increment to the capital stock is the difference between gross investment and depreciation, and is called net investment.

depression
A sustained, long-term decrease in economic activity in one or more economies. It is a more severe economic downturn than a recession, which is a slowdown in economic activity over the course of a normal business cycle.

deregulation
The process of removing or reducing economic regulations, or the total repeal of governmental regulation of the economy. It became common in advanced industrial economies in the 1970s and 1980s, as a result of new trends in economic thinking about the inefficiencies of government regulation, and the risk that regulatory agencies would be controlled by the regulated industry to its benefit, and thereby hurt consumers and the wider economy.

Diamond–Dybvig model

differentiated Bertrand competition

diminishing marginal utility
A situation where each additional, or marginal, unit of a good or service that is consumed brings less utility than the previous unit.

diminishing returns
The decrease in the marginal (incremental) output of a production process as the amount of a single factor of production is incrementally increased, while the amounts of all other factors of production stay constant. The law of diminishing returns states that in all productive processes, adding more of one factor of production while holding all others constant ("ceteris paribus"), will at some point yield lower incremental per-unit returns. It does not imply that adding more of a factor will decrease the total production, a condition known as negative returns, though in practice this is common.

discounting

discrete choice

discretionary income
Money available after one pays taxes.

disequilibrium macroeconomics

disinflation
A decrease in the rate of inflation; a slowdown in the rate of increase of the general price level of goods and services in an economy's gross domestic product over time. It is the opposite of reflation. Disinflation is also distinct from deflation, which occurs when the inflation rate is negative.

dispersed knowledge

disposable income
Money available after one pays taxes and obligatory bill payments.

disposition effect
The tendency to sell an asset that has accumulated in value and resist selling an asset that has declined in value.

dissaving
Negative saving, which occurs when spending is greater than disposable income. This spending may be financed by already accumulated savings, such as money in a savings account, or it can be borrowed.

distribution
The way total economic output, income, or wealth is distributed among individuals or among the factors of production (such as labor, land, and capital). In general theory and the national income and product accounts, each unit of output corresponds to a unit of income.

dividend imputation

Dixit–Stiglitz model

dollar auction

Domar serfdom model

domestic final demand (DFD)
See aggregate demand.

domestic final supply (DFS)
Same as aggregate supply.

Dorfman–Steiner condition

Dorfman–Steiner theorem

double marginalization

Doughnut model

Downs–Thomson paradox

dual-sector model

Duggan–Schwartz theorem

duopoly
A situation in which there are exactly two suppliers for a particular good or service.

dynamic discrete choice

dynamic stochastic general equilibrium (DSGE)
Also abbreviated DGE and SDGE. 
A method in macroeconomics that attempts to explain economic phenomena, such as economic growth and business cycles, and the effects of economic policy, through econometric models based on applied general equilibrium theory and microeconomic principles.

E
Easterlin paradox

ecological model of competition

econometrics
The application of statistical methods to economic data in order to give empirical content to economic relationships. More precisely, it is "the quantitative analysis of actual economic phenomena based on the concurrent development of theory and observation, related by appropriate methods of inference".

economic base analysis

economic calculation problem

economic costs
Total costs, including money spent on production and opportunity costs.

economic democracy

economic development
Broad improvement in the economic well-being or quality of life of a nation, region, or community, often but not necessarily as a consequence of economic growth.

economic efficiency

economic equilibrium
A situation in which economic forces such as supply and demand are balanced and in which, in the absence of external influences, the values of economic variables do not change. For example, in the standard textbook model of perfect competition, equilibrium occurs at the point at which quantity demanded and quantity supplied are equal. Market equilibrium in this case is a condition in which a market price is established through competition such that the amount of goods or services sought by buyers is equal to the amount of goods or services produced by sellers. This price is often called the competitive price or market clearing price and will tend not to change unless demand or supply changes, and the quantity is called the "competitive quantity" or market clearing quantity. However, the concept of equilibrium in economics also applies to imperfectly competitive markets, where it takes the form of a Nash equilibrium.

economic growth
An increase in the inflation-adjusted market value of the goods and services produced by an economy over time. It is conventionally measured as the percent rate of increase in real gross domestic product, or real GDP.

economic indicator
Any measurable unit of the economy which helps economists assess the past or make predictions about the future, such as unemployment rate and gross domestic product.

economic interdependence
The existence of necessary relationships between different sectors of the economy and how the decisions and actions of one will impact the others.

economic model
A theoretical construct representing an economic process by a set of variables and a set of logical and/or quantitative relationships between them. Economic models are usually simplified, often mathematical, frameworks designed to illustrate complex processes. Frequently, economic models posit structural parameters. A model may have various exogenous variables, and those variables may change to create various responses by economic variables. Methodological uses of models include investigation, theorizing, and fitting theories to the world.

economic rent
Also called economic profits.
Any monies collected by a firm above and beyond what is required to keep an entrepreneur owner interested in continuing in business.

economic security

economic shortage
Also called excess demand.
A situation in which the demand for a particular good or service exceeds its supply within a particular market. A shortage is the opposite of a surplus.

economic surplus
Also called excess supply.
A situation in which the supply of a good or service exceeds its demand within a particular market, often as a result of the current price being below the economic equilibrium.

economic system
Also called an economic order.
A system of production, resource allocation, and distribution of goods and services within a society or a given geographic area. It includes the combination of the various institutions, agencies, entities, decision-making processes, and patterns of consumption that comprise the economic structure of a given community. As such, an economic system is a type of social system. The mode of production is a related concept. All economic systems have three basic questions to ask: what to produce, how to produce it, and in what quantities and who receives the output of production.

economics
The social science that studies the production, distribution, and consumption of goods and services within economies.

economies of agglomeration

economies of scale
The cost advantages that enterprises obtain as a result of the increased efficiency offered by a certain scale of operation (typically measured by amount of output produced), with cost per unit of output decreasing with increasing scale. At the basis of economies of scale there may be technical, statistical, organizational, or related factors to the degree of market control.

economies of scope
The cost advantages that enterprises obtain as a result of the increased efficiency offered by variety rather than by volume, with cost per unit of output decreasing with increasing variety. In economics, "scope" is synonymous with broadening production through diversified products. For example, a gas station that sells gasoline can also sell soda, milk, baked goods, etc. through their customer service representatives, which may make the sale of gasoline more efficient.

economist
A practitioner in the discipline of economics.

economy
An area of the production, distribution, trade, and consumption of goods and services by different agents. In its broadest sense, an economy may be defined as "a social domain that emphasizes the practices, discourses, and material expressions associated with the production, use, and management of resources".

Edgeworth box

Edgeworth paradox

Edgeworth's limit theorem

effective demand

efficiency dividend

efficiency wage

efficient envy-free division

efficient-market hypothesis

elastic demand
Demand that is sensitive to changes in price, such that changes in price have a relatively large effect on the quantity of the good demanded. Contrast inelastic demand.

elasticity
The measurement of the proportional change of an economic variable in response to a change in another. Colloquially, elasticity is often interpreted as how easy it is for a supplier or consumer to change their behavior and substitute another good, the strength of an incentive over choices per the relative opportunity cost.

elasticity of complementarity

elasticity of intertemporal substitution

elasticity of substitution
Measures the sensitivity of the ratio of the use of two goods to a change in the ratio of their marginal values or prices.

Elliott wave principle

Ellsberg paradox

endogenous growth theory

envelope theorem

endogenous variable

energy modeling

Engel curve

engineering economics
Previously known as engineering economy, is a subset of economics concerned with the use and "...application of economic principles" in the analysis of engineering decisions.

entrepreneurship
The efforts by a person, known as an entrepreneur, in organizing resources for the creation of something new or taking risks to create new innovations and production.

environmental economics
A sub-field of economics concerned particularly with environmental issues.

equal opportunity
A state of fairness in which job applicants are treated similarly, unhampered by artificial barriers or prejudices or preferences, except when particular distinctions can be explicitly justified.

equilibrium
The point at which quantity demanded and quantity supplied are equal and both consumer and producer are satisfied.

equilibrium price
The market price at which both the supplier and consumer will trade and both are satisfied.

equity
Also called economic equality.
The concept or idea of fairness in economics, particularly in regard to taxation or welfare economics. More specifically, it may refer to equal life chances regardless of identity, to provide all citizens with a basic and equal minimum of income, goods, and services or to increase funds and commitment for redistribution.

equity home bias puzzle

equity premium puzzle

ergodicity economics

Eurosclerosis

excess burden of taxation

excess supply
Also called economic surplus.
A situation in which the quantity of a good or service supplied is more than the quantity demanded, and the price is above the equilibrium level determined by supply and demand; that is, the quantity of the product that producers wish to sell exceeds the quantity that potential buyers are willing to buy at the prevailing price. It is the opposite of an economic shortage.

exchange rate
The rate at which one currency is exchanged for another. It is also commonly regarded as the value of one country's currency relative to another currency.

exchange rate regime

excludability

exogenous growth model

exogenous variable

expected utility hypothesis

expeditionary economics
An emerging field of economic enquiry that focuses on the rebuilding and reconstructing of economies in post-conflict nations and providing support to disaster-struck nations. It focuses on the need for good economic planning on the part of developed nations to help prevent the creation of failed states. It also emphasizes the need for the structuring on new firms to rebuild national economies.

expenditure function

experimental economics

externality
A cost or benefit that falls not on the person(s) directly involved in an activity, but on others. Externalities can be positive or negative.

extreme poverty

F
factors of production
Inputs (resources) used to create goods and services, including land, labor, capital, and entrepreneurship.

factor price

factor price equalization

factor income

fair trade

fair trade debate

fascism

Faustmann's formula

federal funds rate target

Federal Open Market Committee (FOMC)
The twelve-member committee of the United States Federal Reserve that meets several times a year to decide the course of action that should be taken to control the money supply of the United States.

Federal Reserve System
Often simply the Federal Reserve or the Fed.
The central bank of the United States, created by Congress in 1913 and charged with the duty of regulating the money supply and monitoring its member banks.

Fed model

Fei–Ranis model of economic growth

Feldman–Mahalanobis model

Feldstein–Horioka puzzle

feudalism

fiat money

final good

finance
The study of money and how it is used. Specifically, it deals with the questions of how an individual, company, or government acquires the money needed—called capital in the company context—and how they then spend or invest that money.
 Finance is often split into three areas: personal finance, corporate finance, and public finance. At the same time, finance is about the overall "system", i.e. the financial markets that allow the flow of money, via investments and other financial instruments, between and within these areas; this "flow" is facilitated by the financial services sector. A major focus within finance is thus investment management—called money management for individuals, and asset management for institutions—and finance then includes the associated activities of securities trading, investment banking, financial engineering, and risk management.

financial deepening

financial economics

financial institution
Any firm, such as a bank, that is in the business of holding money for those who save and lending money to those who need loans.

financial markets
Markets where people trade the property rights to assets (like real estate or stocks) or where savers lend money to borrowers.

financial planning
A series of steps used by a person or a firm to achieve a financial goal.

financial risk
The risk assumed by a saver or investor on future outcomes that involve financial losses and gains.

financial transaction
An agreement or communication carried out between a buyer and a seller to exchange an asset for payment.

financial transaction tax

fiscal conservatism

fiscal multiplier
The ratio of change in national income arising from a change in government spending.

fiscal policy
A government’s policy on taxes and spending.

fiscal theory of the price level

Fisher equation

Fisher separation theorem

fixed costs
Costs that have to be paid even if a firm is not producing anything.

foreign exchange market
Also called the currency market or abbreviated Forex or FX.
A global decentralized or over-the-counter market for the trading of currencies. This market determines the foreign exchange rate. It includes all aspects of buying, selling and exchanging currencies at current or determined prices. In terms of trading volume, it is by far the largest market in the world, followed by the credit market.

fractional-reserve banking

framing effect

free good

free market
An economic system in which the prices for goods and services are self-regulated by the open market and by consumers. In a free market, the laws and forces of supply and demand are free from any intervention by a government or other authority and from all forms of economic privilege, monopolies, and artificial scarcities. Proponents of the concept of the free market contrast it with a regulated market in which a government intervenes in supply and demand through various methods such as tariffs used to restrict trade and to protect the local economy. In an idealized free-market economy, prices for goods and services are set freely by the forces of supply and demand and are allowed to reach their point of equilibrium without intervention by government policy.

free-rider problem

free trade
Trade between countries that occurs with few or no trade barriers.

Freiburg school

freshwater economics

frictional unemployment
Unemployment that is a result of workers moving from one job to another, as opposed to structural unemployment.

Friedman rule

Friedman's k-percent rule

Frisch–Waugh–Lovell theorem

full employment

full employment output (Y*)
How much output is produced in the economy when full employment exists in the labor market.

full-reserve banking

functions of money
The four classic functions or uses of money as summarized by William Stanley Jevons in 1875: a medium of exchange, a common measure of value (or unit of account), a standard of value (or standard of deferred payment), and a store of value. This analysis later became a fundamental concept of macroeconomics. Most modern textbooks now list only three functions, that of medium of exchange, unit of account, and store of value, not considering a standard of deferred payment as a distinguished function, but rather subsuming it in the others.

fundamental theorems of asset pricing

fundamental theorems of welfare economics

future value

G
gains from trade

Gale–Shapley algorithm

Galor–Zeira model

Gandhian economics

GDP deflator

general equilibrium theory

Georgism

Gerschenkron effect

Gibbard–Satterthwaite theorem

Gibbard's theorem

Gibrat's law

Gibson's paradox

Giffen good

gift economy

Gini coefficient

global labor arbitrage

gold standard

good

Goodhart's law

Goodwin model

Gorman polar form

Gossen's 1st law

Gossen's 2nd law

Gossen's 3rd law

government revenue
The total revenue received by all three levels of government (federal, state, and local) in the form of taxes and tariffs.

government spending
The total expenditure made by all three levels of government (federal, state, and local) for public services.

grand supercycle

great moderation

Green economy

Green paradox

Greenwood–Hercowitz–Huffman preferences

Gresham's law

Grinold and Kroner Model

Grosch's law

gross domestic product (GDP)
The value of all goods and services produced in the economy in a given period of time, usually a quarter or a year.

gross national income (GNI)

gross private domestic investment

Grossman model of health demand

growth recession
A situation in which economic growth is slow but not low enough to be a recession, yet unemployment still increases.guns versus butter model

H
happiness economics

Harrington paradox

Harris–Todaro model

Harrod–Domar model

Hauser's law

health economics

Heckscher–Ohlin model

Heckscher–Ohlin theorem

hedonic index

hedonic regression

Henry George theorem

Herfindahl–Hirschman index

heterodox economics

Hicksian demand function

hiding hand principle

Hindu rate of growth

Hirschman cycle

historical school

Hodrick–Prescott filter

Holmström's theorem

home bias in trade puzzle

home bias puzzle

homo economicus

Hotelling's law

Hotelling's lemma

hourglass economy

household
The sector of the economy which purchases goods from the product market and sells labor, land, and entrepreneurship ability to the factor market in the circular flow market.

housing starts
The number of new houses being built during a period of time.

Huff model

human capital
The knowledge and skills that people use to help them produce output.

human capital flight

humanistic economics

hyperinflation
Inflation which occurs at an extremely high rate, usually in excess of 20 or 30 per cent per month.

I
Icarus paradox

immiserizing growth

implicit cost

import

import substitution industrialization

import quota

impossible trinity

imputation

Inada conditions

incentive

income

income distribution

income effect
The change in consumption resulting from a change in income.

income elasticity of demand (YED)
Measures the sensitivity of a good's demand to income.

increasing returns
A situation where each additional amount of a resource used in a production process brings forth successively larger amounts of output.

indifference curve

Indigo era

indirect inference

Individual Retirement Account (IRA)
A retirement (savings) instrument that allows a person to save money through time while deferring taxes on that income until retirement.

induced consumption

induced demand

industrial organization

industry
A sector of the economy in which different firms produce similar or identical goods or services.

inelastic demand
Demand that is not very sensitive to changes in price, such that changes in price have a relatively small effect on the quantity of the good demanded. Contrast elastic demand.

inferior good

inflation
When the overall level of prices in the economy is rising.

inflationism

inflation rate
A measure of how the overall level of prices in the economy changes over time. If the inflation rate is positive, prices are rising; if the inflation rate is negative, prices are falling.

inflation targeting

information asymmetry

information economics

input–output model

institutional complementarity

intensity of preference

interest

interest rate
The price you have to pay to borrow money.

interest rate parity

intermediate consumption

international economics

international futures

international trade

intertemporal choice

intertemporal equilibrium

intra-industry trade

inventory bounce

investment
Any increase in the economy's stock of capital.

investment fund

invisible hand
Adam Smith’s famous idea that when constrained by competition, each firm’s greed causes it to act in a socially optimal way, as if guided to do the right thing by an invisible hand.

IS–LM model

IS/MP model

isoquant

J
Jaimovich–Rebelo preferences

JEL classification codes

Jevons paradox

Joan Robinson's growth model

job demands-resources model

job hunting

joint product pricing

Jones model

Juglar cycle

just price
A theory of ethics which attempts to set standards of fairness for economic transactions.

K
Kaldor–Hicks efficiency

Kaldor's facts

Kaldor's growth laws

Kaldor's growth model

Keynes effect

Keynesian beauty contest

Keynesian cross

Keynesian economics
Also called Keynesianism.
A diverse set of macroeconomic theories about how in the short run (and especially during recessions) economic output can be strongly influenced by the total amount of spending that occurs within an economy, known as aggregate demand. Keynesian economists generally argue that because aggregate demand is often unstable and behaves erratically, it does not necessarily or predictably equal the aggregate supply, which can cause market economies to experience inefficient macroeconomic outcomes in the form of recessions (when demand is low) and inflation (when demand is high), and that these outcomes can be mitigated by monetary policy actions by a central bank and fiscal policy actions by a government authority, which can help stabilize output over the business cycle.

Keynes–Ramsey rule

Keynes's theory of wages and prices

Khazzoom–Brookes postulate

King–Plosser–Rebelo preferences

Kitchin cycle

Kiyotaki–Moore model

Knightian uncertainty
A lack of any quantifiable knowledge about some possible occurrence, as opposed to the presence of quantifiable risk (e.g., that in statistical noise or a parameter's confidence interval). The concept acknowledges some fundamental degree of ignorance, a limit to knowledge, and an essential unpredictability of future events.

knowledge spillover

Kondratiev wave

Kraków school

Kuhn's theorem

Kuznets curve

Kuznets swing

L
labor

labor economics

labor rights

labor theory of value

Laffer curve

laissez-faire

Lange model

Lausanne school

law of demand
An economic rule stating that quantity demanded and price move in opposite directions, i.e. as demand increases, price decreases, and vice versa.

law of diminishing marginal utility
An economic rule stating that the additional satisfaction a consumer gets from purchasing one more unit of a product will decrease with each additional unit purchased.

law of increasing costs

law of supply

leakage

leakage effect

leapfrogging

lease

Lehman wave

lemon market

lending

Leontief paradox

Leontief production function

Leontief utilities

leprechaun economics
Distortion of national accounts data by corporate tax schemes.

Lerman ratio

Lerner index
An index ranging from 0 to 1 that measures a firm's market power given the price it sets and its marginal cost.

Lerner paradox

Lerner symmetry theorem

Lewis–Mogridge position

liability
Financial responsibility for something.

liberal paradox

limit price

loan

local multiplier effect
Also called the local premium
The additional economic benefit accrued to a geographic area from money being spent in the local economy.

local tax
Any tax paid to a city or county, e.g. sales taxes, school taxes, or property taxes.

location model

long run

long-run shutdown condition
A situation where a firm’s total revenues exceed its variable costs but are less than its total costs. The firm continues to operate until its fixed cost contracts expire.

long-term financing

LoopCo

loose money policy
A monetary policy that makes credit inexpensive and abundant, possibly leading to inflation.

Lorenz curve

loss aversion

Lucas critique

Lucas paradox

Lundberg lag

luxury good

M
macroeconomic model

macroeconomic policy instruments

macroeconomic populism

macroeconomic regulation and control

macroeconomics
The study of the economy as a whole, concentrating on
economy-wide factors such as interest rates, inflation, and unemployment. Macroeconomics also encompasses the study of economic growth and how governments use monetary and fiscal policy to try to moderate the harm caused by recessions.

major trading partner
In international trading, a country or group of countries with which one country trades more than with others.

Malthusian growth model

Malthusianism

managerial economics

Mandeville's paradox

manorialism

Marchetti's constant

marginal cost
The additional increase in total cost when one more unit of output is produced.

marginal efficiency of capital

marginalism

marginal product of capital

marginal product of labor

marginal propensity to consume

marginal propensity to import

marginal propensity to save

marginal rate of substitution

marginal rate of technical substitution

marginal revenue
The additional income earned from selling one more unit of a good; sometimes equal to price.

marginal utility
The change in total utility that results from consuming the next unit of a good or service. Marginal utility can be positive or negative.

marginal value

market

market basket
A bundle of goods and services selected to measure inflation. Economists define a market basket, such as the Consumer Price Index, and then track how much money it takes to buy this basket from one period to the next.

market economy
An economy in which almost all economic activity happens in markets, with little or no interference by the government; often referred to as a laissez-faire ("leave alone") economic system.

market failures
Situations where markets deliver socially non-optimal outcomes. Two common causes of market failure are asymmetric information and public goods.

market structure
The structure of a market as a whole, taking into consideration two main factors: the number of firms in the market and whether goods offered are identical, similar, or differentiated.

market production
Term that economists use to capture what happens when one individual offers to make or sell something to another individual at a price agreeable to both.

market system

markets
Places where buyers and sellers come together to trade money for a good or service.

Marshallian demand function

Marxian economics

Matthew effect

Mayfield's paradox

Meade Conflict

medium of exchange

mental accounting

menu cost

mercantilism

merger simulation

Metcalfe's law

Methodenstreit

Metzler paradox

microeconomics
A branch of economics that studies individual people and individual businesses. For people, microeconomics studies how they behave when faced with decisions about where to spend their money or how to invest their savings. For businesses, it studies how profit-maximising firms behave individually, as well as when competing against each other in markets.

Mincer earnings function

minimum wage

Minsky moment

missing market

mixed economy
An economic system blending elements of a market economy with elements of a planned economy, free markets with state interventionism, or private enterprise with public enterprise.

modern monetary theory

modern portfolio theory

modified gross national income

Modigliani–Miller theorem

monetarism
A school of thought in monetary economics which emphasizes the role of governments in controlling the amount of money in circulation (the money supply). Monetarists assert that variations in the money supply have major influences on national output in the short run and on price levels over longer periods, and that the objectives of monetary policy are best met by targeting the growth rate of the money supply rather than by engaging in discretionary policy.

monetary circuit theory

monetary-disequilibrium theory

 
monetary economics

monetary/fiscal debate

monetary policy
Using changes in the money supply to change interest rates in order to stimulate or slow down economic activity.

monetary reform

monetary system

money
Anything customarily used as a medium of exchange, a unit of accounting, and a store of value.

money illusion

money multiplier

money supply

MONIAC

monopolistic competition
A situation in which many firms with slightly
different products compete. Production costs are above what may be achieved by perfectly competitive firms, but society benefits from the product
differentiation.

monopoly
A firm with no competitors in its industry. A monopoly firm produces less output, has higher costs, and sells its output for a higher price than it would if constrained by competition.

monopsony

moral hazard

mortgage

motivation

moving equilibrium theorem

multiplier

multiplier uncertainty
Any lack of perfect knowledge of the multiplier effect of a particular policy action, such as a monetary or fiscal policy change, upon the intended target of the policy.

Mundell–Fleming model

mutual fund

mutual fund separation theorem

mutualism

N
Nakamura number

Nash equilibrium

national average salary

national income and product accounts

national income policy agreement

national tax
Any tax paid to a national or federal government, e.g. income tax, tariffs, and social security taxes.

national wealth
The total value of capital and private property that is owned within a country.

natural monopoly
An industry in which one large producer can produce output at a lower cost than many small producers. It undersells its rivals and ends up as the only firm surviving in its industry.

natural resource economics

need
Any good or service that is fundamentally necessary for survival, such as food, clothing, and shelter.

Neoclassical economics

Neoclassical synthesis

Neoliberalism

Neo-Ricardianism

Neo-Schumpeterian economics

net national income

net national product

network effect

New Keynesian economics

new trade theory (NTT)

nominal interest rates
Interest rates that measure the returns to a loan
in terms of money borrowed and money returned (as opposed to real interest rates).

nominal prices
Money prices, which can change over time due to inflation. (See also real prices.)

nominal wages
Wages measured in money. (See also real wages.)

non-convexity

non-price determinant of demand
Any reason other than price that changes the will to buy a good or service, for example, fads, income, taste, future expectation, and population.

non-rivalry

normal good

North–South model

Norwegian paradox

no-trade theorem

O
occupational choice model

occupational licensing

Okun's law

Okishio's theorem

oligopoly
An industry with only a few firms. If these firms collude, they form a cartel, which may reduce output and drive up profits in the same way a monopoly does.

oligopsony

open energy modelling initiative

open energy system models

open-market operations
The buying and selling of government bonds by a central bank; that is, transactions that take place in the public, or open, bond market.

open music model

opportunity cost
The value of the next best alternative thing that could have been done. It measures what is given up in order to do the most preferred thing.

ordinary good

organizational economics

Ostrom's law

overheating

overlapping generations model

overshooting model

overtaking criterion

P
Pacman conjecture

parable of the broken window

paradox of competition

paradox of flexibility

paradox of prosperity

paradox of thrift

paradox of toil

paradox of value

parallel economic model

parental dividend

Pareto efficiency
Also called Pareto optimality.

Pareto principle

participation

participatory economics

partnership
A business that two or more individuals own and operate together.

Peltzman effect

penetration pricing

per capita
A unit of account per person, usually placed at the end of an economic indicator.

perfect competition
A situation where numerous small firms producing
identical products compete against each other in a given industry. Perfect competition leads to firms producing the socially optimal output level at the minimum possible cost per unit.

personal property
Possessions such as jewelry, furniture, and real estate that people can amass through time.

Phillips curve

 
physical capital
All human-made goods that are used to produce other goods and services, such as tools, machines, and buildings.

physiocracy

Pigou effect

Pigouvian tax

Polak model

policy mix

policy-ineffectiveness proposition

polytomous choice

population economics
See demographic economics.

Pork cycle

post-Keynesian economics

PPP puzzle

Prebisch–Singer hypothesis

preference

price
The amount of money it takes to buy a product or produce a product.
 
price ceiling
A market intervention in which the government ensures that the price of a good or service stays below the free market price.

price controls

price discrimination

price elasticity of demand (PED)
Measures the sensitivity of a good's demand to its price.

price elasticity of supply (PES)
Measures the sensitivity of a good's supply to its price.

price floor
A market intervention in which the government keeps the price of a good or service above its free-market price.

price index
A normalized average of price relatives for a given class of goods or services in a given region and during a given period of time. It is a statistic designed to help to compare how these price relatives, taken as a whole, differ between geographical locations or time periods. Notable price indices include consumer price index, producer price index, and GDP deflator.

price level

price point

price–specie flow mechanism

price war

pricing

pricing science
The application of social and business science methods to the problem of setting prices.

prime rate
Also called the prime lending rate.
The interest rate at which a bank will agree to lend to customers with good credit. Floating interest rates are often expressed as a percentage above or below the prime rate.

principal–agent problem

principle of effective demand

private good

producer
An entity, either a person or firm, which supplies goods or services.

producer price index

producer surplus
The gain that producers receive when they can sell their output at a price higher than the minimum amount for which they are willing to make it.

product differentiation

production

production possibilities curve
A graph showing the maximal combinations of goods and services that can be produced from a fixed amount of resources in a given period of time.

productive efficiency
A term describing firms that produce goods and services at the lowest possible cost.

productivism

productivity paradox

production set

Proebsting's paradox

profit

profit motive

progressive tax
A tax schedule that states that the more income one earns, the higher the tax rate will be.

proportional tax
Also called a flat tax.
A tax schedule that states that regardless of income, the same tax rate will be applied to all income earners.

prospect theory

proxemics

public bad

public choice

public economics
Or economics of the public sector, is the study of government policy through the lens of economic efficiency and equity. Public economics builds on the theory of welfare economics and is ultimately used as a tool to improve social welfare.

public good
Goods or services that cannot be profitably produced by private firms because they are impossible to provide to just one person; if you provide them to one person, you have to provide them to everybody. Public goods non-excludable (you can’t prevent anyone from consuming them) and non-rival (it costs no extra to supply one extra person).

pure competition

purchasing power parity (PPP)

Q
quantitative easing (QE)

quantity demanded
The amount of a good or service that a consumer is able and willing to purchase at a given price based on their income and preferences.

quantity supplied
The amount of a good or service that a supplier is able and willing to produce at a given market price.

quantity theory of money
The theory that the overall level of prices in the economy is proportional to the quantity of money circulating in the economy.

quota
A limited quantity of a product that can be produced, imported, or exported.

R
Rabin fairness

Ragnar Nurkse's balanced growth theory

Rahn curve

Ramsey problem

Ramsey–Cass–Koopmans model

rate of profit

rate of return pricing

rational choice
The idea of making choices by using logic and that people will choose the most beneficial of the options afforded.

rational choice institutionalism

rational choice theory

rational expectations
The theory that people optimally change their behaviour in response to policy changes. Depending on the situation, their behavioural changes can greatly limit the effectiveness of policy changes.

rational pricing

rationing

Reaganomics

real business-cycle theory

real income effect
The change in consumption resulting from a change in income, adjusted for inflation.

real interest rates
Interest rates that compensate for inflation by measuring the returns to a loan in terms of units of stuff lent and units of stuff returned (as opposed to nominal interest rates).

real GDP
Gross domestic product that has been adjusted for inflation by applying the price deflator.

real prices
How much of one kind of thing (such as hours worked) you have to give up to get a good or service, no matter what happens to nominal prices.

real wages
Wages measured not in terms of money itself (as nominal wages are) but rather in terms of how much output that money can buy.

rebound effect

recessions
Part of the business cycle during which an economy's total output falls.

recoveries
Part of the business cycle during which an economy’s total output expands.

reflation

regenerative economic theory

regional science

regressive tax
A tax schedule that states that the more income one earns, the lower the tax burden.

regulation
Government restrictions on a business firm.

relative price

repugnancy costs

repugnant market

resource

resource curse

resource depletion

 
retail sales
Purchases of finished goods and services by households and firms.

returns to scale

revealed comparative advantage

revealed preference

revenue
Total income from sales of output.

Ricardian economics

Ricardian equivalence

Ricardian socialism

rights

right to work law
A state law forbidding labor unions from forcing workers to join and pay union dues.
 
risk aversion

risk premium

risk-return relationship
The direct relationship between the risk of an investment and its expected return or profit; the higher the risk, the higher the opportunity for gain or loss and vice versa.

rivalry

Robin Hood effect

Robinson Crusoe economy

Robustness
The ability of a financial trading system to remain effective.

Rostovian take-off model

Rostow's stages of growth

Roy model

Roy's identity

Rybczynski theorem

S
Salamanca school

saltwater economics

saving

saving identity

Say's law

scarcity
Any situation in which people do not have enough resources to satisfy all of their wants. The phenomenon of scarcity is what creates the need for economics.

Schelling's model of segregation

Scitovsky paradox

sector
A portion or component of the larger economy, such as households, firms, or the government.

sectoral balances

seigniorage

service

service economy

service recovery paradox

Shephard's lemma

shift work

shock therapy

short run

shortage

short-run shutdown condition
A situation in which a firm’s total revenues are less than its variable costs, and the firm is better off shutting down immediately and losing only its fixed costs.

shrinkflation

Sisyphism

Smihula waves

snob effect
A situation where the demand for a certain good by individuals of a higher income level is inversely related to its demand by those of a lower income level.

social behavior

social choice theory

social dividend

social mobility

socialist economics

sociality

social multiplier effect
Any situation when an individual's marginal utility of an action increases because his peers also participate in this action. For example, researchers have shown that people are more likely to exercise when their peers exercise.

socially optimal output level
The output level that maximises the benefits that society can get from its limited supply of resources.

social welfare function

social welfare model

socioeconomics
Also called social economics.

sole proprietorship
A business owned and operated by one person.

solidarity economy

Solow residual

Solow–Swan model

Sonnenschein–Mantel–Debreu theorem

sovereign wealth fund

stabilization policy

stagflation
A simultaneous economic phenomenon during which inflation and unemployment are both rising.

standard of deferred payment

 
standard of living

state tax
Any tax paid to a state government, e.g. sales taxes, state income tax, and license plate fees.

steady-state economy

sticky prices
Prices that are slow to adjust to shocks. Price stickiness can cause recessions to linger.

stochastic frontier analysis

stock-flow consistent model

Stockholm School

Stolper–Samuelson theorem

store of value

St. Petersburg paradox

strategic complements

Strauss–Howe generational theory

structural unemployment
Unemployment created due to a decrease in demand for the skills of a worker.

subgame perfect equilibrium

subjective theory of value

substitute good
A product that can satisfy the utility of another.

substitution effect
When consumers react to an increase in a good's price by consuming less of that good and more of other goods.

sunk costs

sunspot

sunspot equilibrium

supply
The total amount of a certain type of good that has been produced and is available.
 
supply and demand
An economic model of markets that separates buyers from sellers and then summarises each group’s behaviour with a single line on a graph. The buyers’ behaviour is captured by the demand curve, whereas the sellers’ behaviour is captured by the supply curve. By putting these two curves on the same graph, economists can show how buyers and sellers interact in markets to determine how much of any particular item is going to be sold, as well as the price at which it is likely to be sold.

supply chain

supply curve
A line on a graph that represents how much of a good or service sellers are going to produce at various prices.
 
supply schedule
A chart that lists how much of a good a supplier will offer at different prices.

supply shock
A sudden shortage of a good.

supply-side economics
A theory in macroeconomics which postulates that lowering tax rates, decreasing government regulation, and allowing free trade is the most effective way to foster economic growth because greater supplies of goods and services at lower prices cause employment to increase and consumers to spend more. Contrast demand-side economics.

surplus

T
tableau économique

tatonnement

tariff
Also called duty.
A tax imposed by the government of a country, or by a supranational union of countries or institutions, on imports or exports of goods. Import duties may serve as a source of revenue for the government as well as a form of regulation of foreign trade by taxing foreign products in order to encourage or safeguard domestic industries that produce the same or similar products. Along with import and export quotas, tariffs are among the most commonly used instruments of protectionism.

tax

tax-benefit model

tax benefits of debt

tax credit

tax deduction

tax rate

Taylor rule

technological theory of social production

terms of trade
The rules that countries impose on each other in order to trade with each other.

Thatcherism

theory of the firm

theory of the second best
Also called the general theory of second best or the second best theorem.
A theory that concerns the situation when one or more optimality conditions cannot be satisfied. It shows that if one optimality condition in an economic model cannot be satisfied, it is possible that the next-best solution involves changing other variables away from the values that would otherwise be optimal.

thermoeconomics

Thirlwall's Law

throw away paradox

tight money policy
Federal Reserve System actions that contract the growth of the nation's money supply for the purpose of reducing or eliminating inflation.

time preference

time preference theory of interest

time value of money

Topkis's theorem

Törnqvist index
Also called Törnqvist-Theil index.
A price or quantity index that measures the weighted geometric mean of the relatives using arithmetic averages of the value shares in two or more periods as weights.

total cost

total surplus
The sum of producer surplus and consumer surplus.

trade

traditional economy
An economy in which production and distribution are handled along the lines of long-standing cultural traditions.

tragedy of the anticommons

tragedy of the commons

transaction cost
A cost in making any economic trade when participating in a market.

transfer payment
Any redistribution of income and wealth by means of the government making a payment, without goods or services being received in return.

transfer payments multiplier
Also called transfer payment multiplier
The multiplier by which aggregate demand will increase when there is an increase in transfer payments (e.g., welfare spending, unemployment payments).

transfer pricing

transformation problem

transport economics

triangle model

Triffin dilemma

trough

Tullock paradox

turnpike model of money

turnpike theory

U
ultimatum game
An asymmetrical, two player game that has become a popular instrument of economic experiments.

underemployment
Working at a job for which one is overqualified, or working part-time when full-time work is desired.

unemployment
Under-utilization of any factor of production, most commonly referring to labor.

unit of account

U.S. Dollar
The official currency of the United States, usually abbreviated as USD.

unitary elastic

universal bank

universal basic income

unskilled labor
Labor that requires no specialized skills, education, or training to perform.

urban economics

utilitarianism

utility
The usefulness of a good or service in satisfying a need or a want.

utility maximization problem

utility representation theorem

Uzawa condition

Uzawa–Lucas model

Uzawa's theorem

V
value

value-added tax (VAT)

variable costs
Any cost that changes in proportion to the amount of goods or services that a firm produces. Variable costs are also the sum of marginal costs over all units produced.

Veblen good

 
velocity of money
Also called the velocity of circulation of money.
Refers to how fast money passes from one holder to the next. It can refer to the income velocity of money, which is the frequency with which the average same unit of currency is used to purchase newly domestically produced goods and services within a given time period. In other words, it is the number of times one unit of money is spent to buy goods and services per unit time.

Verdoorn's law

Virginia school

Von Neumann–Morgenstern utility theorem

W
wage
The monetary compensation (or remuneration, personnel expenses, labor) paid by an employer to an employee in exchange for work done. Payment is typically calculated as a fixed amount for each task completed (a task wage or piece rate), or at an hourly or daily rate (wage labour), or based on some other easily measured quantity of work done.

wage labour

wage slavery

Wagner's law

Walras's law

want
Wants are often distinguished from needs. A need is something that is necessary for survival (such as food and shelter), whereas a want is simply something that a person would like to have. Some economists have rejected this distinction and maintain that all of these are simply wants, with varying levels of importance. By this viewpoint, wants and needs can be understood as examples of the overall concept of demand.

wealth
The abundance of valuable financial assets or physical possessions which can be converted into a form that can be used for transactions. This includes the core meaning as held in the originating old English word weal, which is from an Indo-European word stem. The modern concept of wealth is of significance in all areas of economics, especially for growth economics and development economics, yet the meaning of wealth is context-dependent. Individuals or companies possessing a substantial net worth are often referred to as wealthy. Net worth is defined as the current value of one's assets less liabilities (excluding the principal in trust accounts).

wealth effect
The change in spending that accompanies a change in perceived wealth. Usually the wealth effect is positive: spending changes in the same direction as perceived wealth.

welfare
A type of government support for the citizens of that society. Welfare may be provided to people of any income level, as with social security (and is then often called a social safety net), but it is usually intended to ensure that people can meet their basic human needs such as food and shelter. Welfare attempts to provide a minimal level of well-being, usually either a free- or a subsidized-supply of certain goods and social services, such as healthcare, education, and vocational training.

welfare cost of business cycles

welfare cost of inflation

welfare economics
A branch of economics that uses microeconomic techniques to evaluate well-being (welfare) at the aggregate (economy-wide) level.

welfare trap

Weller's theorem

willingness to accept (WTA)
The minimum amount of money that а person is willing to accept to abandon a good or to put up with something negative, such as pollution. It is equivalent to the minimum monetary amount required for sale of a good or acquisition of something undesirable to be accepted by an individual.

willingness to pay (WTP)
The maximum price at or below which a consumer will definitely buy one unit of a product. This corresponds to the standard economic view of a consumer reservation price. Some researchers, however, conceptualize WTP as a range.

Wonderland model

workforce productivity

World3

World3 nonrenewable resource sector

Wright's law

X
x-efficiency

x-inefficiency

Y
yield
In finance, the yield on a security is the amount of cash (in percentage terms) that returns to the owners of the security, in the form of interest or dividends received from it. Normally, it does not include the price variations, distinguishing it from the total return. Yield applies to various stated rates of return on stocks (common and preferred, and convertible), fixed income instruments (bonds, notes, bills, strips, zero coupon), and some other investment type insurance products (e.g. annuities).

Z
Zelder paradox

zero-sum game
In game theory and economic theory, a zero-sum game is a mathematical representation of a situation in which each participant's gain or loss of utility is exactly balanced by the losses or gains of the utility of the other participants. If the total gains of the participants are added up and the total losses are subtracted, they will sum to zero. Thus, cutting a cake, where taking a larger piece reduces the amount of cake available for others as much as it increases the amount available for that taker, is a zero-sum game if all participants value each unit of cake equally (see marginal utility).

See also
Outline of economics
Index of economics articles


== References ==